apertium-sme-nob.sme.lexc
LEXICON O-NUPPELOHKAI
nuppe#lohkái# DUHAT ;
nuppe#lot# DUHAT ;
goalmmát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
goalmmát#lot# DUHAT ;
njealját#lohkái# DUHAT ;
njealját#lot# DUHAT ;
viđát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
viđát#lot# DUHAT ;
guđát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
guđát#lot# DUHAT ;
čihččet#lohkái# DUHAT ;
čihččet#lot# DUHAT ;
gávccát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
gávccát#lot# DUHAT ;
ovccát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
ovccát#lot# DUHAT ;
logát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
logát#lot# DUHAT ;


! Hundreds of thousands

LEXICON O-2TO9CUO
guokte# O-GCUO ;
golbma# O-GCUO ;
njeallje# O-GCUO ;
njeallja# O-GCUO ;
vihtta# O-GCUO ;
guhtta# O-GCUO ;
čieža# O-GCUO ;
gieža# O-GCUO ;
gávcci# O-GCUO ;
ovcci# O-GCUO ;

LEXICON O-GCUO
 čuođi# JUSTDUHAT ;  ! 100000
 čuođi# DUHAT ;  ! 100000
 čuođi# O-OKTAF ;  ! 101000
čuođi#okta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#akta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#guokte# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#golbma# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#njeallje# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#njeallja# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#vihtta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#guhtta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#čieža# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#gieža# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#gávcci# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#ovcci# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#okta# DUHAT ;
čuođi#akta# DUHAT ;
čuođi#guokte# DUHAT ;
čuođi#golbma# DUHAT ;
čuođi#njeallje# DUHAT ;
čuođi#njeallja# DUHAT ;
čuođi#vihtta# DUHAT ;
čuođi#guhtta# DUHAT ;
čuođi#čieža# DUHAT ;
čuođi#gieža# DUHAT ;
čuođi#gávcci# DUHAT ;
čuođi#ovcci# DUHAT ;
 čuođi# O-LOGIF ; ! 110000, 113000, ...
 čuođi# O-2TO9LOG ;  ! 120000, 123000, ...
 čuođi# O-NUPPELOT ; ! 115000, ...


LEXICON DUHAT
duhát:duháh DUHATCASE ;

! Justduhat, for numrals going via 1000
! -------------------------------------

LEXICON JUSTDUHAT
 duhát# UNDERDUHAT ;  ! Thousand-and-something
duháhat+A+Ord:duháha DUHAHAT ;
duhát# 111TO119 ;
duhát# 21TO99 ;
duhát# LOGIF ;


! Old, for the old counting thirteen hundred etc.
! -----------------------------------------------

LEXICON OLD
okta# NLX ;
akta# NLX ;
guokte# NLX ;
golbma# NLX ;
njeallje# NLX ;
njeallja# NLX ;
vihtta# NLX ;
guhtta# NLX ;
čieža# NLX ;
gieža# NLX ;
gávcci# NLX ;
ovcci# NLX ;

LEXICON NLX
nuppe#lohkái# CUODI ;
nuppe#lohkái# 2TO9CUO ;
nuppe#lot# CUODI ;
nuppe#lot# 2TO9CUO ;
goalmmát#lohkái# CUODI ;
goalmmát#lohkái# 2TO9CUO ;
goalmmát#lot# CUODI ;
goalmmát#lot# 2TO9CUO ;
njealját#lohkái# CUODI ;
njealját#lohkái# 2TO9CUO ;
njealját#lot# CUODI ;
njealját#lot# 2TO9CUO ;
viđát#lohkái# CUODI ;
viđát#lohkái# 2TO9CUO ;
viđát#lot# CUODI ;
viđát#lot# 2TO9CUO ;
guđát#lohkái# CUODI ;
guđát#lohkái# 2TO9CUO ;
guđát#lot# CUODI ;
guđát#lot# 2TO9CUO ;
čihččet#lohkái# CUODI ;
čihččet#lohkái# 2TO9CUO ;
čihččet#lot# CUODI ;
čihččet#lot# 2TO9CUO ;
gávccát#lohkái# CUODI ;
gávccát#lohkái# 2TO9CUO ;
gávccát#lot# CUODI ;
gávccát#lot# 2TO9CUO ;
ovccát#lohkái# CUODI ;
ovccát#lohkái# 2TO9CUO ;
ovccát#lot# CUODI ;
ovccát#lot# 2TO9CUO ;
logát#lohkái# CUODI ;
logát#lohkái# 2TO9CUO ;
logát#lot# CUODI ;
logát#lot# 2TO9CUO ;


LEXICON NUPPELOHKAICUODI
nuppe#lohkái# CUODICASE ;
nuppe#lot# CUODICASE ;
goalmmát#lohkái# CUODICASE ;
goalmmát#lot# CUODICASE ;
njealját#lohkái# CUODICASE ;
njealját#lot# CUODICASE ;
viđát#lohkái# CUODICASE ;
viđát#lot# CUODICASE ;
guđát#lohkái# CUODICASE ;
guđát#lot# CUODICASE ;
čihččet#lohkái# CUODICASE ;
čihččet#lot# CUODICASE ;
gávccát#lohkái# CUODICASE ;
gávccát#lot# CUODICASE ;
ovccát#lohkái# CUODICASE ;
ovccát#lot# CUODICASE ;
logát#lohkái# CUODICASE ;
logát#lot# CUODICASE ;


! Underduhat, the numerals under 1000
! -----------------------------------


LEXICON UNDERDUHAT
OKTAF ;     ! 1, 11
2TO9F ;     ! 2-9
BARELOGIF ;     ! 10
2TO9LOG ; ! 20-90
CUODI ;     ! 100
2TO9CUO ; ! 200-999
1TO9CUODI ;
LOHKI ;
NUPPELOGIS ;

LEXICON OKTAF
num-ordinal-1 ;
okta:ok'ta OKTA ;
okta#lohki:ok'ta OKTALOHKI ;
akta+Num+Sg+Nom:akta%> K ;
akta#lohki+Num+Sg+Nom:akta#lohki%> K ;
! K ; this lead to "go +Clt" as an analysis, and was removed.
! Thus, direction to K should be made at an earlier point


LEXICON 2TO9F
num-ordinal-2to9 ; ! also ordinals of complex numbers
guokte:guok't GUOKTE ;
guovttis+N+Coll+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:guovttes%> K ;
guovttis:guok'tis GUOVTTIS ;
golbma GOLBMA ;
golmmas:golbmas OVCCIS ;
njeallje:njeallj GUOKTE ;
njeallja+Num+Sg+Nom:njeallja%> K ;
njeallja+Num+Sg+Gen:njealja%> K ;
njeallja+Num+Sg+Acc:njealja%> K ;
njealjis:njealljis OVCCIS ;
vihtta:vi VIHTTA ;
viđas:vi VIDAS ;
guhtta:gu VIHTTA ;
guđas:gu VIDAS ;
čieža:či CIEZA ;
gieža:gi CIEZA ;
čiežas:čieh'čas OVCCIS ;
giežas:gieh'čas OVCCIS ;
gávcci:gák'ci GAVCCI ;
gávccis:gák'cis OVCCIS ;
ovcci:ok'ci GAVCCI ;
ovccis:ok'cis OVCCIS ;


LEXICON LOGIF
logi: LOGI ;
logi+Num+Sg+Nom:lot%> K ;
logi+Num+Sg+Attr:lot%> K ;
logi#+Num+Sg+Attr:lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
logát+A+Ord:logád VUOSTTAS ;
logis:loh'kis OVCCIS ;


LEXICON BARELOGIF
logi: LOGI ;
logát+A+Ord:logád VUOSTTAS ;
logis:loh'kis OVCCIS ;
máŋga#logis:máŋga#loh'kis OVCCIS ;

LEXICON LOHKI
lohki+Num+Sg+Nom:lohki%> K ;


LEXICON 2TO9LOG
guokte#logi:guok't GUOKTELOGI ;
golbma#logi:golbma GOLBMALOGI ;
njeallje#logi:njeallj GUOKTELOGI ;
njeallja#logi+Num+Sg+Nom:njeallja#logi%> K ;
njeallja#logi+Num+Sg+Acc:njeallja#logi%> K ;
njeallja#logi+Num+Sg+Gen:njealja#logi%> K ;
vihtta#logi:vi VIHTTALOGI ;
guhtta#logi:gu VIHTTALOGI ;
čieža#logi:či CIEZALOGI ;
gieža#logi:gi CIEZALOGI ;
gávcci#logi:gák'ci GAVCCILOGI ;
ovcci#logi:ok'ci GAVCCILOGI ;
nubbe#lohki:nubb NUBBELOGI ;
nubbe# LOHKAI-END ;
guokte# LOHKAI-END ;
golbma# LOHKAI-END ;
njeallje# LOHKAI-END ;
njeallja# LOHKAI-END ;
vihtta# LOHKAI-END ;
guhtta# LOHKAI-END ;
čieža# LOHKAI-END ;
gieža# LOHKAI-END ;
gávcci# LOHKAI-END ;
ovcci# LOHKAI-END ;


LEXICON 2TO9CUO
guokte# GCUODI ;
golbma# GCUODI ;
njeallje# GCUODI ;
njeallja# GCUODI ;
vihtta# GCUODI ;
guhtta# GCUODI ;
čieža# GCUODI ;
gieža# GCUODI ;
gávcci# GCUODI ;
ovcci# GCUODI ;

LEXICON GCUODI
čuođi#:čuođi# LOGIF ;
čuođi#guokte#logi:čuođi#guok't GUOKTELOGI  ;
čuođi#golbma#logi:čuođi#golbma GOLBMALOGI ;
čuođi#njeallje#logi:čuođi#njeallj GUOKTELOGI ;
čuođi#vihtta#logi:čuođi#vi VIHTTALOGI ;
čuođi#guhtta#logi:čuođi#gu VIHTTALOGI ;
čuođi#čieža#logi:čuođi#či CIEZALOGI ;
čuođi#gieža#logi:čuođi#gi CIEZALOGI ;
čuođi#gávcci#logi:čuođi#gák'ci GAVCCILOGI ;
čuođi#ovcci#logi:čuođi#ok'ci GAVCCILOGI ;
čuođi#guokte# LOHKAI-END  ;
čuođi#golbma# LOHKAI-END ;
čuođi#njeallje# LOHKAI-END ;
čuođi#vihtta# LOHKAI-END ;
čuođi#guhtta# LOHKAI-END ;
čuođi#čieža# LOHKAI-END ;
čuođi#gieža# LOHKAI-END ;
čuođi#gávcci# LOHKAI-END ;
čuođi#ovcci# LOHKAI-END ;
čuođi#:čuođi# OKTAF ;
čuođi#:čuođi# 2TO9F ;
čuođát+A+Ord:čuođád VUOSTTAS ;
čuođi# 21TO99 ;
čuođi# 111TO119 ;
čuođi#:čuođi# LOHKI ;


LEXICON 1TO9CUODI
akta#čuohti+Num+Sg+Nom:akta#čuohti%> K ;
okta#čuohti:ok'ta OKTACUOHTI ;
guokte#čuođi:guok't GUOKTECUODI ;
nubbe#čuohti:nubb NUBBECUOHTI ;
golbma#čuođi:golbma GOLBMACUODI ;
njeallje#čuođi:njeallj GUOKTECUODI ;
njeallja#čuođi+Num+Sg+Nom:njeallja#čuođi%> K ;
njeallja#čuođi+Num+Sg+Acc:njeallja#čuođi%> K ;
njeallja#čuođi+Num+Sg+Gen:njealja#čuođi%> K ;
vihtta#čuođi:vi VIHTTACUODI ;
guhtta#čuođi:gu VIHTTACUODI ;
čieža#čuođi:či CIEZACUODI ;
gieža#čuođi:gi CIEZACUODI ;
gávcci#čuođi:gák'ci GAVCCICUODI ;
ovcci#čuođi:ok'ci GAVCCICUODI ;


! Case forms of the basic digits
! ------------------------------

LEXICON OKTA
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:»X4# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ; ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub+Use/NG:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X3j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn K ;
 

LEXICON O-CUODI
 čuođi# JUSTDUHAT ;  ! 100000
 čuođi# DUHAT ;  ! 100000
čuođi#okta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#akta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#guokte# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#golbma# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#njeallje# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#njeallja# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#vihtta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#guhtta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#čieža# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#gieža# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#gávcci# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#ovcci# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#okta# DUHAT ;
čuođi#akta# DUHAT ;
čuođi#guokte# DUHAT ;
čuođi#golbma# DUHAT ;
čuođi#njeallje# DUHAT ;
čuođi#njeallja# DUHAT ;
čuođi#vihtta# DUHAT ;
čuođi#guhtta# DUHAT ;
čuođi#čieža# DUHAT ;
čuođi#gieža# DUHAT ;
čuođi#gávcci# DUHAT ;
čuođi#ovcci# DUHAT ;
 okta#čuohti# JUSTDUHAT ;  ! 100000
 okta#čuohti# DUHAT ;  ! 100000
okta#čuohti#okta# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#akta# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#guokte# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#golbma# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#njeallje# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#njeallja# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#vihtta# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#guhtta# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#čieža# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#gieža# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#gávcci# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#ovcci# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#okta# DUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#akta# DUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#guokte# DUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#golbma# DUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#njeallje# DUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#njeallja# DUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#vihtta# DUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#guhtta# DUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#čieža# DUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#gieža# DUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#gávcci# DUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#ovcci# DUHAT ;
čuohte# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohte# DUHAT ;
 čuohti# JUSTDUHAT ;  ! 100000
 čuohti# DUHAT ;  ! 100000
čuohti#okta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#akta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#guokte# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#golbma# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#njeallje# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#njeallja# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#vihtta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#guhtta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#čieža# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#gieža# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#gávcci# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#ovcci# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#okta# DUHAT ;
čuohti#akta# DUHAT ;
čuohti#guokte# DUHAT ;
čuohti#golbma# DUHAT ;
čuohti#njeallje# DUHAT ;
čuohti#njeallja# DUHAT ;
čuohti#vihtta# DUHAT ;
čuohti#guhtta# DUHAT ;
čuohti#čieža# DUHAT ;
čuohti#gieža# DUHAT ;
čuohti#gávcci# DUHAT ;
čuohti#ovcci# DUHAT ;
LEXICON CUODI
čuođi#:čuođi# LOGIF ;
čuođi#:čuođi# OKTAF ;
čuođi#:čuođi# 2TO9F ;
čuođi#:čuođi# LOHKI ;
okta#čuohti#:okta#čuohti# LOGIF ;
okta#čuohti#:okta#čuohti# OKTAF ;
okta#čuohti#:okta#čuohti# 2TO9F ;
okta#čuohti#:okta#čuohti# LOHKI ;
čuohti#:čuohti# LOGIF ;
čuohti#:čuohti# OKTAF ;
čuohti#:čuohti# 2TO9F ;
čuohti#:čuohti# LOHKI ;
LEXICON num-imprecise
máŋga#nuppe#lohkái#:máŋ'ga#nuppe#lohkái# DUHAT ;
máŋga#logi#:máŋ'ga#logi# DUHAT ;
máŋga#čuođi#:máŋ'ga#čuođi# DUHAT ;
moadde#nuppe#lohkái#:moadde#nuppe#lohkái# DUHAT ;
moadde#logi#:moadde#logi# DUHAT ;
moadde#čuođi#:moadde#čuođi# DUHAT ;
galle#nuppe#lohkái#:galle#nuppe#lohkái# DUHAT ;
galle#logi#:galle#logi# DUHAT ;
galle#čuođi#:galle#čuođi# DUHAT ;
beal#okta+Use/Sub:beal#ok'ta OKTA ; !time
beal% okta:beal% ok'ta OKTA ; !time
